Hawaii, session 2026, SB3297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of land and natural resources shall transfer fee simple title ownership of the parcels of land identified as the following tax map keys:  (3) 4-1-6:7 and (3) 2-6-18:1 to the department of agriculture and biosecurity pursuant to Act 90, Session Laws of Hawaii 2003. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________